Hawaii statutes.
§633-35 Other rights of judgment creditor.
Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, or in the rules of court, a party
obtaining a judgment in the small claims division of the district court is
entitled to the same remedies, processes, costs, and benefits as are given or
inure to other judgment creditors in the court. [L 1970, c 182, pt of §1; am L
1971, c 144, §28]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next